Idaho, session 2025, H0372.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Appellate Public Defender for the
Office of the State Appellate Public Defender program the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the General
Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $129,500
Operating Expenditures 8,200
Capital Outlay 2,100
TOTAL $139,800
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Appellate Public Defender is hereby increased by one (1.00) for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the State Appellate Public Defender any unexpended and unencumbered
balances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Appellate Public De-
fender from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025, in an amount not to exceed
$1,209,400 from the General Fund for costs directly related to the provision
of representation in capital cases, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the
State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense
class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing
the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the State Appellate Public Defender any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the State Appellate Public Defender
from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025 from the General Fund for costs di-
rectly related to outside counsel for noncapital appeals, to be used for non-


recurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount,
by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office
prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.